Utah statutes.
75-7-517.   Execution and levies prohibited.
(1)  No execution may issue upon nor may any levy be made against any property
of the deceased settlor's estate under any judgment against a deceased settlor
or a trustee.
(2)  This section may not be construed to prevent the enforcement of
mortgages, pledges, or liens upon real or personal property in an appropriate
proceeding.
